Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 10. Costs and Accounts

§ 3-3-1001.
Payment of court costs.

No order shall be entered approving an annual report of a guardian or conservator until the court costs which have been incurred in the guardianship or conservatorship have been paid or provided for.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

§ 3-3-1002.
Court costs of guardianship.

The ward or his estate shall be charged with the court costs of a guardianship of a ward, including the reasonable fees of the guardian and the attorney for the guardian.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-1003.
Court costs of conservatorship.

The ward or his estate shall be charged with the court costs of a conservatorship for a ward, including the reasonable fees of the conservator and the attorney for the conservator.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

Quoted

in

Sands v. Brown (In re Sands), 2013 WY 60,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(May 15, 2013).

§ 3-3-1004.
Settlement of accounts.

The court shall settle each account filed by a conservator by allowing or disallowing it, either in whole or in part, or by surcharging the account against the conservator.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.